src/fst/stems/prepositions.lexc
LEXICON Preposition
re+Prep:re # ; !of/de
ru+Prep:ru # ; !from/de
chirix+Prep:chirix # ; !about/sobre
eb'+Prep:eb' # ; !FIXME synonymous with the suffix eb'
chi+Prep:chi # ; !with verb yook to form continuous
rik'in+Prep:rik'in # ; !near/cerca
